Washington statutes.
RCW 18.233.010

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Advisory committee" means the music therapy advisory committee.

(2) "Commission" means the Washington medical commission.

(3) "Department" means the department of health.

(4) "Music therapist" means a person licensed to practice music therapy pursuant to this chapter.

(5)(a) "Music therapy" means the clinical and evidence-based use of music interventions to accomplish individualized goals of music therapy clients by employing strategies and tools that include but are not limited to:

(i) Accepting referrals for music therapy services from health care or educational professionals, family members, or caregivers;

(ii) Conducting music therapy assessments of a client to determine appropriate music therapy services;

(iii) Developing and implementing individualized music therapy treatment plans that identify goals, objectives, and strategies of music therapy that are appropriate for clients;

(iv) Using music therapy techniques such as improvisation, performance, receptive music listening, song writing, lyric discussion, guided imagery with music, learning through music, and movement to music;

(v) During the provision of music therapy services to a client, collaborating, as applicable, with the client's treatment team, including physicians, psychologists, occupational therapists, licensed clinical social workers, or other mental health professionals. During the provision of music therapy services to a client with a communication disorder, the licensed professional music therapist shall collaborate and discuss the music therapy treatment plan with the client's audiologist, occupational therapist, or speech-language pathologist. When providing educational or health care services, a music therapist may not replace the services provided by an audiologist, occupational therapist, or speech-language pathologist;

(vi) Evaluating a client's response to music therapy techniques and the individualized music therapy treatment plan;

(vii) Any necessary modification of the client's individualized music therapy treatment plan;

(viii) Any necessary collaboration with other health care professionals treating a client;

(ix) Minimizing barriers that may restrict a client's ability to receive or fully benefit from music therapy services; and

(x) Developing a plan for determining when the provision of music therapy services is no longer needed.

(b) "Music therapy" does not include the screening, diagnosis, or assessment of any physical, mental, or communication disorder.

(6) "Secretary" means the secretary of health or his or her designee.

[ 2023 c 175 s 2.]